test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-juodu_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Adjective - juodu+: # adjectives 'dish / kulho' - full paradigm
     juodu+N+Sg+Nom: juodu
     juodu+N+Sg+Gen: juvvan
     juodu+N+Sg+Acc: [juodu, juvvan]
     juodu+N+Sg+Par: juodua
     juodu+N+Sg+Tra: juvvakse
     juodu+N+Sg+Abe: [juvvata, juvvattah]
     juodu+N+Sg+Com: juvvanke
     juodu+N+Sg+Ine: juvvas
     juodu+N+Sg+Ela: [juvvaspäi, juvvas]
     juodu+N+Sg+Ill: juodah
     juodu+N+Sg+Ade: juvval
     juodu+N+Sg+Abl: [juvvalpäi, juvval]
     juodu+N+Sg+All: juvvale
     juodu+N+Sg+Ess: juvvannu
     juodu+N+Sg+Ter: juodassah
     juodu+N+Sg+Apr: juvvalluo
     juodu+N+Pl+Nom: juvvat
     juodu+N+Pl+Gen: juodien
     juodu+N+Pl+Acc: juvvat
     juodu+N+Pl+Par: juodii
     juodu+N+Pl+Tra: juvvikse
     juodu+N+Pl+Abe: [juvvittah, juvvita]
     juodu+N+Pl+Com: juodienke
     juodu+N+Pl+Ine: juvvis
     juodu+N+Pl+Ela: [juvvispäi, juvvis]
     juodu+N+Pl+Ill: juodih
     juodu+N+Pl+Ade: juvvil
     juodu+N+Pl+Abl: [juvvilpäi, juvvil]
     juodu+N+Pl+All: juvvile
     juodu+N+Pl+Ess: juvvinnu
     juodu+N+Pl+Ins: juvvin
     juodu+N+Pl+Apr: juodielluo
     juodu+N+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: juodugi
     juodu+N+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: juvvangi
     juodu+N+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [juodugi, juvvangi]
     juodu+N+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: juoduagi
     juodu+N+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: juvvaksegi
     juodu+N+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [juvvatagi, juvvattahgi]
     juodu+N+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: juvvankegi
     juodu+N+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: juvvasgi
     juodu+N+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [juvvaspäigi, juvvasgi]
     juodu+N+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: juodahgi
     juodu+N+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: juvvalgi
     juodu+N+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [juvvalpäigi, juvvalgi]
     juodu+N+Sg+All+Clt/gi: juvvalegi
     juodu+N+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: juvvannugi
     juodu+N+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: juodassahgi
     juodu+N+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: juvvalluogi
     juodu+N+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: juvvatgi
     juodu+N+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: juodiengi
     juodu+N+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: juvvatgi
     juodu+N+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: juodiigi
     juodu+N+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: juvviksegi
     juodu+N+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [juvvitagi, juvvittahgi]
     juodu+N+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: juodienkegi
     juodu+N+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: juvvisgi
     juodu+N+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [juvvispäigi, juvvisgi]
     juodu+N+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: juodihgi
     juodu+N+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: juvvilgi
     juodu+N+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [juvvilpäigi, juvvilgi]
     juodu+N+Pl+All+Clt/gi: juvvilegi
     juodu+N+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: juvvinnugi
     juodu+N+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: juvvingi
     juodu+N+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: juodielluogi
